Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-309
Certificate of public convenience and necessity or permit; required; exception.

Except for operations pursuant to a contract authorized by sections 75-303.02 and 75-303.03, it shall be unlawful for any common or contract carrier by motor vehicle subject to the provisions of sections 75-101 to 75-155 and 75-301 to 75-322 to engage in any intrastate operations on any public highway in Nebraska unless there is in force with respect to such common carrier a certificate of public convenience and necessity, a permit to such contract carrier, or a permit to a transportation network company under section 75-324, issued by the commission which authorizes such operations.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 9, p. 1381;

Laws 1967, c. 479, § 15, p. 1482;

Laws 1989, LB 78, § 24;

Laws 1993, LB 412, § 9;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 72;

Laws 1995, LB 424, § 36;

Laws 2015, LB629, § 28;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 86.

The Public Service Commission has original jurisdiction and sole power to grant, amend, deny, revoke, or transfer common carrier certificates of public convenience and necessity, and such proceedings are administrative and legislative in character. In re Application of Kilthau, 236 Neb. 811, 464 N.W.2d 162 (1991).

Applicant's fitness and his claimed violation hereof are to be judged by the commission on the record before it. Robinson v. National Trailer Convoy, Inc., 188 Neb. 474, 197 N.W.2d 633 (1972).

Carrier has no right to tack authorities unless that right is granted in certificate. Nebraska State Railway Commission v. Seward Motor Freight, Inc., 188 Neb. 223, 196 N.W.2d 200 (1972).